Illinois, session 104th, SB3821.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Sections 3-9-2, 3-12-5, and 3-13-5 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-9-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-9-2)7    Sec. 3-9-2. Work Training Programs. 8    (a) The Department of Juvenile Justice, in conjunction 9with the private sector, may establish and offer work training 10to develop work habits and equip persons committed to it with 11marketable skills to aid in their community placement upon 12release. Committed persons participating in this program shall 13be paid wages similar to those of comparable jobs in the 14surrounding community. The wages paid under this Section shall 15not be less than the minimum hourly wage set forth in Section 4 16of the Minimum Wage Law. A portion of the wages earned shall go 17to the Department of Juvenile Justice to pay part of the 18committed person's room and board, a portion shall be 19deposited into the Violent Crime Victim's Assistance Fund to 20assist victims of crime, and the remainder shall be placed 21into a savings account for the committed person which shall be 22given to the committed person upon release. The Department 23shall promulgate rules to regulate the distribution of the   SB3821- 2 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1wages earned.2    (b) The Department of Juvenile Justice may establish 3programs of incentive by achievement, participation in which 4shall be on a voluntary basis, to sell goods or services to the 5public with the net earnings distributed to the program 6participants subject to rules of the Department of Juvenile 7Justice.8    (c) For the purposes of this Section, "work" includes any 9task assigned to a committed person for which a wage would have 10been due, except for his or her status as a committed person. 11(Source: P.A. 94-696, eff. 6-1-06.) 12    (730 ILCS 5/3-12-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-12-5)13    Sec. 3-12-5. Compensation. Persons performing a work 14assignment under subsection (a) of Section 3-12-2 shall may 15receive wages under rules and regulations of the Department. 16In determining rates of compensation, the Department shall 17consider the effort, skill and economic value of the work 18performed. The compensation paid under this Section shall not 19be less than the minimum hourly wage set forth in Section 4 of 20the Minimum Wage Law. Compensation shall may be given to 21persons who participate in other programs of the Department. 22If the committed person files a lawsuit determined frivolous 23under Article XXII of the Code of Civil Procedure, 50% of the 24compensation shall be used to offset the filing fees and costs 25of the lawsuit as provided in that Article until all fees and   SB3821- 3 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1costs are paid in full. All other wages shall be deposited in 2the individual's account under rules and regulations of the 3Department. For the purposes of this Section, "work" includes 4any task assigned to a committed person for which a wage would 5have been due, except for his or her status as a committed 6person. 7(Source: P.A. 101-235, eff. 1-1-20.) 8    (730 ILCS 5/3-13-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-13-5)9    Sec. 3-13-5. Wages and Working Conditions. 10    A person on work release shall not be required to work for 11less than the prevailing wage or under worse than prevailing 12working conditions in the area. The wages paid under this 13Section shall not be less than the minimum hourly wage set 14forth in Section 4 of the Minimum Wage Law. The Department 15shall charge businesses reasonable hourly rates for meals and 16the housing of committed persons on work release, if 17applicable. For the purposes of this Section, "work" includes 18any task assigned to a committed person for which a wage would 19have been due, except for his or her status as a committed 20person. 21(Source: P.A. 77-2097.) 22    Section 10. The Minimum Wage Law is amended by changing 23Sections 3 and 4 and by adding Sections 4b and 7.5 as follows:   SB3821- 4 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1    (820 ILCS 105/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1003)2    Sec. 3. As used in this Act: 3    (a) "Director" means the Director of the Department of 4Labor, and "Department" means the Department of Labor.5    (b) "Wages" means compensation due to an employee by 6reason of his employment, including allowances determined by 7the Director in accordance with the provisions of this Act for 8gratuities and, when furnished by the employer, for meals and 9lodging actually used by the employee.10    (c) "Employer" includes any individual, partnership, 11association, corporation, limited liability company, business 12trust, governmental or quasi-governmental body, or any person 13or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the 14interest of an employer in relation to an employee, for which 15one or more persons are gainfully employed on some day within a 16calendar year. An employer is subject to this Act in a calendar 17year on and after the first day in such calendar year in which 18he employs one or more persons, and for the following calendar 19year.20    (d) "Employee" includes any individual permitted to work 21by an employer in an occupation, and includes, notwithstanding 22subdivision (1) of this subsection (d), one or more domestic 23workers as defined in Section 10 of the Domestic Workers' Bill 24of Rights Act, but does not include any individual permitted 25to work:26        (1) For an employer employing fewer than 4 employees   SB3821- 5 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1    exclusive of the employer's parent, spouse or child or 2    other members of his immediate family.3        (2) As an employee employed in agriculture or 4    aquaculture (A) if such employee is employed by an 5    employer who did not, during any calendar quarter during 6    the preceding calendar year, use more than 500 man-days of 7    agricultural or aquacultural labor, (B) if such employee 8    is the parent, spouse or child, or other member of the 9    employer's immediate family, (C) if such employee (i) is 10    employed as a hand harvest laborer and is paid on a piece 11    rate basis in an operation which has been, and is 12    customarily and generally recognized as having been, paid 13    on a piece rate basis in the region of employment, (ii) 14    commutes daily from his permanent residence to the farm on 15    which he is so employed, and (iii) has been employed in 16    agriculture less than 13 weeks during the preceding 17    calendar year, (D) if such employee (other than an 18    employee described in clause (C) of this subparagraph): 19    (i) is 16 years of age or under and is employed as a hand 20    harvest laborer, is paid on a piece rate basis in an 21    operation which has been, and is customarily and generally 22    recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis in 23    the region of employment, (ii) is employed on the same 24    farm as his parent or person standing in the place of his 25    parent, and (iii) is paid at the same piece rate as 26    employees over 16 are paid on the same farm.  SB3821- 6 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1        (3) (Blank).2        (4) As an outside salesman.3        (5) As a member of a religious corporation or 4    organization.5        (6) At an accredited Illinois college or university 6    employed by the college or university at which he is a 7    student who is covered under the provisions of the Fair 8    Labor Standards Act of 1938, as heretofore or hereafter 9    amended.10        (7) For a motor carrier and with respect to whom the 11    U.S. Secretary of Transportation has the power to 12    establish qualifications and maximum hours of service 13    under the provisions of Title 49 U.S.C. or the State of 14    Illinois under Section 18b-105 (Title 92 of the Illinois 15    Administrative Code, Part 395 - Hours of Service of 16    Drivers) of the Illinois Vehicle Code.17        (8) As an employee employed as a player who is 28 years 18    old or younger, a manager, a coach, or an athletic trainer 19    by a minor league professional baseball team not 20    affiliated with a major league baseball club, if (A) the 21    minor league professional baseball team does not operate 22    for more than 7 months in any calendar year or (B) during 23    the preceding calendar year, the minor league professional 24    baseball team's average receipts for any 6-month period of 25    the year were not more than 33 1/3% of its average receipts 26    for the other 6 months of the year.   SB3821- 7 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1    The above exclusions from the term "employee" may be 2further defined by regulations of the Director.3    (e) "Occupation" means an industry, trade, business or 4class of work in which employees are gainfully employed.5    (f) "Gratuities" means voluntary monetary contributions to 6an employee from a guest, patron or customer in connection 7with services rendered.8    (g) "Outside salesman" means an employee regularly engaged 9in making sales or obtaining orders or contracts for services 10where a major portion of such duties are performed away from 11his employer's place of business.12    (h) "Day camp" means a seasonal recreation program in 13operation for no more than 16 weeks intermittently throughout 14the calendar year, accommodating for profit or under 15philanthropic or charitable auspices, 5 or more children under 1618 years of age, not including overnight programs. The term 17"day camp" does not include a "day care agency", "child care 18facility" or "foster family home" as licensed by the Illinois 19Department of Children and Family Services. 20    (i) "Interested party" means an organization that monitors 21or is attentive to compliance with public or worker safety 22laws, wage and hour requirements, or other statutory 23requirements. 24(Source: P.A. 99-758, eff. 1-1-17; 100-192, eff. 8-18-17.) 25    (820 ILCS 105/4)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1004)  SB3821- 8 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1    Sec. 4. (a)(1) Every employer shall pay to each of his 2employees in every occupation wages of not less than $2.30 per 3hour or in the case of employees under 18 years of age wages of 4not less than $1.95 per hour, except as provided in Sections 5 5and 6 of this Act, and on and after January 1, 1984, every 6employer shall pay to each of his employees in every 7occupation wages of not less than $2.65 per hour or in the case 8of employees under 18 years of age wages of not less than $2.25 9per hour, and on and after October 1, 1984 every employer shall 10pay to each of his employees in every occupation wages of not 11less than $3.00 per hour or in the case of employees under 18 12years of age wages of not less than $2.55 per hour, and on or 13after July 1, 1985 every employer shall pay to each of his 14employees in every occupation wages of not less than $3.35 per 15hour or in the case of employees under 18 years of age wages of 16not less than $2.85 per hour, and from January 1, 2004 through 17December 31, 2004 every employer shall pay to each of his or 18her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 19occupation wages of not less than $5.50 per hour, and from 20January 1, 2005 through June 30, 2007 every employer shall pay 21to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or older 22in every occupation wages of not less than $6.50 per hour, and 23from July 1, 2007 through June 30, 2008 every employer shall 24pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 25older in every occupation wages of not less than $7.50 per 26hour, and from July 1, 2008 through June 30, 2009 every   SB3821- 9 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 2years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 3than $7.75 per hour, and from July 1, 2009 through June 30, 42010 every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees 5who is 18 years of age or older in every occupation wages of 6not less than $8.00 per hour, and from July 1, 2010 through 7December 31, 2019 every employer shall pay to each of his or 8her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 9occupation wages of not less than $8.25 per hour, and from 10January 1, 2020 through June 30, 2020, every employer shall 11pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 12older in every occupation wages of not less than $9.25 per 13hour, and from July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020 every 14employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 15years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 16than $10 per hour, and from January 1, 2021 through December 1731, 2021 every employer shall pay to each of his or her 18employees who is 18 years of age or older in every occupation 19wages of not less than $11 per hour, and from January 1, 2022 20through December 31, 2022 every employer shall pay to each of 21his or her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 22occupation wages of not less than $12 per hour, and from 23January 1, 2023 through December 31, 2023 every employer shall 24pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 25older in every occupation wages of not less than $13 per hour, 26and from January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2024, every   SB3821- 10 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 2years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 3than $14 per hour; and from on and after January 1, 2025 4through June 30, 2026, every employer shall pay to each of his 5or her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 6occupation wages of not less than $15 per hour; and from July 71, 2026 through December 31, 2027, every employer shall pay to 8each of his or her employees in every occupation wages of not 9less than $17 per hour; and from January 1, 2028 through 10December 31, 2028, every employer shall pay to each of his or 11her employees in every occupation wages of not less than $19 12per hour; and from January 1, 2029 through December 31, 2029, 13every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees in 14every occupation wages of not less than $21 per hour; and from 15January 1, 2030 through December 31, 2030, every employer 16shall pay to each of his or her employees in every occupation 17wages of not less than $23 per hour; and from January 1, 2031 18through December 31, 2031, every employer shall pay each of 19his or her employees in every occupation wages of not less than 20$25 per hour; and on and after January 1, 2032, every employer 21shall pay to each of his or her employees in every occupation 22wages of not less than $27 per hour, except as provided in 23Section 4b.24    (2) Unless an employee's wages are reduced under Section 256, then in lieu of the rate prescribed in item (1) of this 26subsection (a), an employer may pay an employee who is 18 years   SB3821- 11 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1of age or older, during the first 90 consecutive calendar days 2after the employee is initially employed by the employer, a 3wage that is not more than 50¢ less than the wage prescribed in 4item (1) of this subsection (a); however, an employer shall 5pay not less than the rate prescribed in item (1) of this 6subsection (a) to:7        (A) a day or temporary laborer, as defined in Section 8    5 of the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act, who is 18 9    years of age or older; and10        (B) an employee who is 18 years of age or older and 11    whose employment is occasional or irregular and requires 12    not more than 90 days to complete. 13    (3) At no time on or before December 31, 2019 shall the 14wages paid to any employee under 18 years of age be more than 1550¢ less than the wage required to be paid to employees who are 16at least 18 years of age under item (1) of this subsection (a). 17Beginning on January 1, 2020, every employer shall pay to each 18of his or her employees who is under 18 years of age that has 19worked more than 650 hours for the employer during any 20calendar year a wage not less than the wage required for 21employees who are 18 years of age or older under paragraph (1) 22of subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act. Every employer 23shall pay to each of his or her employees who is under 18 years 24of age that has not worked more than 650 hours for the employer 25during any calendar year: (1) $8 per hour from January 1, 2020 26through December 31, 2020; (2) $8.50 per hour from January 1,   SB3821- 12 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b12021 through December 31, 2021; (3) $9.25 per hour from 2January 1, 2022 through December 31, 2022; (4) $10.50 per hour 3from January 1, 2023 through December 31, 2023; (5) $12 per 4hour from January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2024; and (6) 5$13 per hour from on and after January 1, 2025 through June 30, 62026; and (7) on and after July 1, 2026, every employer shall 7pay to each of his or her employees who is under 18 years of 8age no less than the minimum hourly wage set forth in 9subsection (a) of Section 4, regardless of an employee's age 10or the number of hours worked.11    (b) No employer shall discriminate between employees on 12the basis of sex or mental or physical disability, except as 13otherwise provided in this Act by paying wages to employees at 14a rate less than the rate at which he pays wages to employees 15for the same or substantially similar work on jobs the 16performance of which requires equal skill, effort, and 17responsibility, and which are performed under similar working 18conditions, except where such payment is made pursuant to (1) 19a seniority system; (2) a merit system; (3) a system which 20measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; or (4) 21a differential based on any other factor other than sex or 22mental or physical disability, except as otherwise provided in 23this Act.24    (c) Every employer of an employee engaged in an occupation 25in which gratuities have customarily and usually constituted 26and have been recognized as part of the remuneration for hire   SB3821- 13 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1purposes is entitled to an allowance for gratuities as part of 2the hourly wage rate provided in Section 4, subsection (a) in 3an amount that follows: not to exceed 40% of the applicable 4minimum wage rate through June 30, 2026; not to exceed 30% of 5the applicable minimum wage rate from July 1, 2026 through 6December 31, 2027; not to exceed 20% of the applicable minimum 7wage rate from January 1, 2028 through December 31, 2028; and 8not to exceed 10% of the applicable minimum wage rate from 9January 1, 2029 through December 31, 2029. On and after 10January 1, 2030, an employer shall not be entitled to an 11allowance for gratuities and shall pay each employee no less 12than the applicable minimum wage rate provided in subsection 13(a) of Section 4. The Director shall require each employer 14desiring an allowance for gratuities to provide substantial 15evidence that the amount claimed, which may not exceed 40% of 16the applicable minimum wage rate, was received by the employee 17in the period for which the claim of exemption is made, and no 18part thereof was returned to the employer. 19    (d) No camp counselor who resides on the premises of a 20seasonal camp of an organized not-for-profit corporation shall 21be subject to the adult minimum wage if the camp counselor (1) 22works 40 or more hours per week, and (2) receives a total 23weekly salary of not less than the adult minimum wage for a 2440-hour week. If the counselor works less than 40 hours per 25week, the counselor shall be paid the minimum hourly wage for 26each hour worked. Every employer of a camp counselor under   SB3821- 14 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1this subsection is entitled to an allowance for meals and 2lodging as part of the hourly wage rate provided in Section 4, 3subsection (a), in an amount not to exceed 25% of the minimum 4wage rate.5    (e) A camp counselor employed at a day camp is not subject 6to the adult minimum wage if the camp counselor is paid a 7stipend on a onetime or periodic basis and, if the camp 8counselor is a minor, the minor's parent, guardian or other 9custodian has consented in writing to the terms of payment 10before the commencement of such employment.11(Source: P.A. 101-1, eff. 2-19-19.) 12    (820 ILCS 105/4b new)13    Sec. 4b. Consumer price index-u adjustments.14    (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b), 15beginning on January 1, 2033, and on every January 1 16thereafter, the minimum hourly wage from the previous year 17shall be increased in proportion to the increase, if any, in 18the consumer price index-u. If the consumer price index-u 19increases by more than 2.5% in any year, the minimum hourly 20wage shall not be increased by more than 2.5%. Any increase to 21the minimum hourly wage made in accordance with this 22subsection shall be rounded up to the nearest multiple of 23$0.05. The new amount resulting from each annual adjustment 24shall be determined by the Department of Labor and made 25available to the public by the Department of Labor's website.   SB3821- 15 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1For the purposes of this subsection, "consumer price index-u" 2means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 3the United States Department of Labor that measures the 4average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 5all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 61982-84 = 100.7    (b) If the unemployment rate in this State for the 8preceding year, as calculated by the Department of Employment 9Security, is equal to or greater than 8.5%, the minimum hourly 10wage shall not be increased. 11    (820 ILCS 105/7.5 new)12    Sec. 7.5. Powers of the Department and civil penalties.13    (a) The Department shall inquire into any alleged 14violations of this Act, brought to its attention by an 15interested party, to institute the actions for the penalties 16provided in this Section and to enforce the provisions of this 17Act. In addition to the relief set forth in this Act, an 18employer shall be assessed a civil penalty of $1,000 for each 19violation of this Act, payable to the Department. Each 20employee who is subject to a violation of this Act shall 21constitute a separate violation.22    (b) Upon a reasonable belief that an employer covered by 23this Act is in violation of any part of this Act, an interested 24party may assert that a violation of this Act has occurred and 25bring an action for penalties in the county where the   SB3821- 16 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1violation is alleged to have occurred or where the principal 2office of the employer is located, pursuant to the following 3sequence of events:4        (1) The interested party submits to the Department a 5    complaint describing the violation and naming the employer 6    alleged to have violated this Act.7        (2) The Department sends notice of complaint to the 8    named party alleged to have violated this Act and the 9    interested party. The named party may either contest the 10    alleged violation or cure the alleged violation.11        (3) The named party contests or cures the alleged 12    violation within 30 days after the receipt of the notice 13    of complaint or, if the named party does not respond 14    within 30 days, the Department issues a notice of right to 15    sue to the interested party as described in this Act.16        (4) The Department issues a notice of right to sue to 17    the interested party, if one or more of the following has 18    occurred:19            (A) the named party has cured the alleged 20        violation to the satisfaction of the Director;21            (B) the Director has determined that the 22        allegation is unjustified or that the Department does 23        not have jurisdiction over the matter or the parties; 24        or25            (C) the Director has determined that the 26        allegation is justified or has not made a   SB3821- 17 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1        determination, and either has decided not to exercise 2        jurisdiction over the matter or has concluded 3        administrative enforcement of the matter.4    (c) If, within 180 days after service of the notice of 5complaint to the parties, the Department has not (i) resolved 6the contest and cure period, (ii) with the mutual agreement of 7the parties, extended the time for the named party to cure the 8violation and resolve the complaint, or (iii) issued a right 9to sue letter, the interested party may initiate a civil 10action for penalties. The parties may extend the 180-day 11period by mutual agreement. The limitations period for the 12interested party to bring an action for the alleged violation 13of this Act shall be tolled for the 180-day period and for the 14period of any mutually agreed extensions. At the end of the 15180-day period, or any mutually agreed extensions, the 16Department shall issue a right to sue letter to the interested 17party.18    (d) Any claim or action filed under this Section must be 19made within 3 years after the alleged conduct resulting in the 20complaint plus any period for which the limitations period has 21been tolled.22    (e) In an action brought under this Section, an interested 23party may recover against the employer any statutory penalties 24set forth in subsection (a) and injunctive relief. An 25interested party who prevails in a civil action shall receive 2610% of any statutory penalties assessed, plus any attorney's   SB3821- 18 -LRB104 19735 SPS 33185 b1fees and expenses in bringing the action.2    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent 3an employee from bringing a civil action for the employee's 4own claim for a violation of this Act as described in this Act.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.